North Carolina statutes. Chapter 127C. North Carolina Military Affairs Commission. [Repealed]
§§ 127C-1 through 127C-5.

Recodified as G.S. 143B-1310 through G.S. 143B-1314 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 24.1(
l
). For effective date, see Editor’s Note.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 24.1(ww), Session Laws 2015-268, s. 7.3(a), made the recodification of this Chapter by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 24.1(
l
), effective July 1, 2015.

Former G.S. 127C-3, which was recodified as G.S. 143B-1312 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 24.1(
l
), was repealed by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 24.1(y). Session Laws 2015-241, s. 24.1(ww), as amended by Session Laws 2015-268, s. 7.3(a), made the repeal effective July 1, 2015.

Former G.S. 127C-4 was previously repealed by Session Laws 2013-227, s. 2, effective August 1, 2013.